California, session 20252026, AB2002.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 3.16 (commencing with Section 50515.11) is added to Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 3.16. Regional Early Action Planning50515.11. The Legislature finds and declares the following:(a) The regional housing needs assessment (RHNA) is a core component of the state’s housing planning framework and establishes the basis for local housing element law obligations.(b) Regional governments perform essential functions in implementing RHNA, including methodology development, public engagement, and distributing regional housing need to local jurisdictions.(c) RHNA responsibilities have increased in complexity and scope, and regional governments require consistent and adequate resources to fulfill these responsibilities.(d) Funding provided through the Local Government Planning Support Grants Program (Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 50515)) demonstrated that targeted investments in regional planning activities support local housing element implementation and advance state housing goals.(e) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide councils of governments, regional entities, and jurisdictions with resources to support the seventh and subsequent RHNA cycles.50515.12. For purposes of this article:(a) “Council of governments” means a single-county or multicounty council created pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code that is responsible for allocating regional housing need under Sections 65584, 65584.04, and 65584.05 of the Government Code.(b) “Jurisdiction” means a city, county, or city and county.(c) “Regional entity” means a regional government that is not a council of government governments that is responsible for allocating regional housing need pursuant to Sections 65584, 65584.04, and 65584.05 of the Government Code.(d) “Regional housing need assessment” or “RHNA” means the existing and projected need for housing for each region, as determined by the department pursuant to Section 65584.01 of the Government Code.50515.13. (a) The Regional Early Action Planning Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury for the purpose of providing councils of governments, regional entities, and jurisdictions with one-time funding, including grants for planning activities to enable those entities to meet the seventh and subsequent cycles of the regional housing need assessment.(b) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the fund shall be made available to the department for allocation in accordance with this chapter.50515.14. (a) The department shall allocate funds from the Regional Early Action Planning Fund to each council of governments or regional entity responsible for allocating regional housing need, pursuant to Sections 65584, 65584.04, and 65584.05 of the Government Code, in accordance with this section.(b) A council of governments or regional entity may apply for funds, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, beginning 39 months prior to the next applicable housing element due date pursuant to Section 65588 of the Government Code.(c) Funds shall be distributed by the department on a population basis based on the most recent population estimates posted on the Department of Finance’s internet website.(d) An application shall include, at minimum and in a form and manner prescribed by the department, all of the following information:(1) An allocation budget for the funds provided pursuant to this section.(2) Amounts to be retained by the council of governments or regional entity, and any suballocations to jurisdictions.(3) An explanation of how proposed uses will increase housing planning and facilitate local housing production.(4) Identification of current best practices at the regional and statewide level that promote sufficient supply of housing affordable to all income levels, and a strategy for increasing adoption of these practices at the regional level, where viable.(5) An education and outreach strategy to inform jurisdictions of the need and benefits of taking early action related to housing need, as quantified by the regional housing need assessment.(e) The department shall review an application submitted pursuant to this section within 30 days, otherwise the application shall be deemed approved. Upon approval of an application for funds pursuant to this section, the department shall award the moneys for which the council of governments or regional entity, as applicable, qualify.50515.15. (a) A council of governments or regional entity may expend funds awarded pursuant to Section 50515.14 for any of the following purposes:(1) Activities that support the development, improvement, or implementation of the methodology for the seventh and subsequent RHNA cycles, to further the objectives described in subdivision (d) of Section 65584 of the Government Code.(2) Suballocating moneys directly and equitably to jurisdictions or other subregional entities in the form of grants for planning that will accommodate the development of housing and infrastructure that accelerates housing production in a way that aligns with state planning priorities, and housing, transportation, equity, and climate goals.(3) Providing jurisdictions with technical assistance, planning, temporary staffing, or consultant needs associated with updating local planning and zoning documents, including any activity related to updating or implementing a jurisdiction’s housing element, expediting application processing, and other actions to accelerate additional housing production.(4) Administrative costs necessary to implement this section, which may be up to 5 percent of an entity’s total award.(5) Activities to establish a regional or countywide housing trust, or to allocate a portion of funds to an existing regional or countywide housing trust, for the purpose of supporting planning, predevelopment, or other activities that facilitate the production of housing consistent with this chapter.(6) Activities, determined in consultation with the department, that support regional or local housing planning priorities consistent with this chapter.(b) A jurisdiction that receives a suballocation of funds pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall only use that suballocation for housing-related planning activities, including, but not limited to, the following:(1) Technical assistance in improving housing permitting processes, tracking systems, and planning tools.(2) Establishing regional or countywide housing trust funds for affordable housing.(3) Performing infrastructure planning, including for sewers, water systems, transit, roads, or other public facilities necessary to support new housing and new residents.(4) Performing feasibility studies to determine the most efficient locations to site housing consistent with Sections 65041.1 and 65080 of the Government Code.(5) Covering the costs of temporary staffing or consultant needs associated with the activities described in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a).(c) A council of governments or regional entity receiving funds shall submit annual reports to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The reports shall include information on expenditures and suballocations to jurisdictions.(d) A council of governments or regional entity shall submit a final report to the department upon expenditure of all funds, or as otherwise required by the department. The final report shall include information on outcomes achieved, including the corresponding impact on housing within the region.(e) The department may publish a summary of information received pursuant to this section on its internet website.(f) The department may monitor expenditures and activities of an applicant, as the department deems necessary, to ensure compliance with program requirements.(g)The department shall issue guidelines to implement this chapter. The adoption, amendment, or repeal of guidelines authorized by this subdivision is hereby exempted from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(g) (1) Each recipient of funds under the program shall expend those funds no later than three years from the date of award of those funds.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the department may provide additional time, as necessary, to ensure the effective use of funds for housing element implementation and related planning activities.(h) (1) The department, in collaboration with stakeholders, shall adopt emergency regulations, in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to implement this chapter.(2) Notwithstanding Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall remain in effect until the date that nonemergency regulations to implement this chapter become effective.